Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-917
Political subdivision; return of funds not required.

Any political subdivision which has received funds pursuant to section 77-913 shall not be required to return any funds received pursuant to such section resulting from a final order or judgment of a court that such tax is unconstitutional.

Laws 1986, LB 1114, § 16.